District of Columbia statutes.
15-111

Counsel fee in proceeding on bond or undertaking.

In a proceeding in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to recover damages upon a bond or undertaking given to obtain a restraining order or preliminary or pendente lite injunction, the Court, in assessing damages to be recovered thereunder, may include such reasonable counsel fees as the party damaged by the restraining order or injunction may have incurred in obtaining a dissolution thereof.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 678, Pub. L. 88-509, § 3(b)(1)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(3)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-111.
1973 Ed., § 15-111.